Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Comprehensive Health Insurance Association.

Sec. 21.55.010.
Creation; membership; information from members.

There is established a nonprofit incorporated legal entity to be known as the Comprehensive Health Insurance Association. Membership consists of all licensed hospital or medical service corporations in the state that offer subscriber contracts for major medical coverage, all health maintenance organizations or other managed care arrangements approved by the director, all licensed self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements in the state, and all insurers licensed to transact health insurance in the state that offer policies for major medical coverage on an expense incurred basis. All members shall maintain membership in the association as a condition of doing health insurance business, or being able to offer subscriber contracts or enrollment in a health maintenance organization, self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, or managed care arrangement in the state.

A member shall submit reports and provide information required by the board or the director to implement this chapter as a condition of transacting business in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 45 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 108 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.55.020.
Board of directors; organization.

The board of directors of the association consists of seven individuals. Five board members shall be selected by association members, subject to approval by the director of the division of insurance, and two board members shall be consumers selected by the director of the division of insurance. The director or the director’s designee is a nonvoting ex officio member of the board. A member of the board serves for a term of three years and may be reappointed to an unlimited number of terms. The term of a board member shall continue until a successor is appointed.

In approving members of the board, the director shall consider, among other things, whether all types of association members are fairly represented.

In determining voting rights at association meetings, an association member is entitled to vote in person or by proxy. The vote shall be a weighted vote based on the association member’s share of assessments as determined under AS

21.55.220

.

At board meetings, a board member is entitled to one vote in person or by proxy.

A member of the board may be reimbursed from the association for expenses incurred as a result of board activities, but may not otherwise be compensated for services by the association. The costs of conducting meetings of the association and its board of directors shall be the responsibility of the members of the association.

The board shall study and prepare a report at least once every three years on the effectiveness of this chapter. The report must include an analysis of the effectiveness of this chapter in promoting rate stability, product availability, and affordability of coverage. The report may contain recommendations for legislative or other regulatory action. The board shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

In this section, “board” means the board of directors of the association.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 42 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 108 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.55.030.
General powers.

The association may

exercise the powers granted to insurers under the laws of the state;

sue or be sued;

enter into contracts with insurers, similar associations in other states, or with other persons for the performance of administrative functions;

establish administrative and accounting procedures for the operation of the association; and

receive funds from sources other than members of the association.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.55.040.
Plan of operation.

The association shall submit to the director a plan of operation and amendments necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the association. The plan of operation and amendments become effective upon approval in writing by the director. If the association fails to submit a suitable plan of operation by December 22, 1992, or if at subsequent time the association fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the director may, after notice and hearing, adopt reasonable regulations necessary or advisable to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. These regulations shall continue in force until modified by the director or superseded by a plan submitted by the association and approved by the director.

All members of the association shall comply with the plan of operation.

The plan of operation shall

establish procedures whereby all the powers and duties of the association under this chapter will be performed;

establish procedures for handling assets of the association;

establish the amount and method of reimbursing members of the board of directors under AS

21.55.020

;

establish regular places and times for meetings of the board of directors;

establish procedures for records to be kept of all financial transactions of the association, its agents, and the board of directors;

provide that a member insurer aggrieved by a final action or decision of the association may appeal to the director within 30 days after the action or decision;

establish procedures whereby selections for the board of directors will be submitted to the director;

contain additional provisions necessary or proper for the execution of the powers and duties of the association.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.55.050.
Administrative Procedure Act.

The association is exempt from AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.55.060.
Tax exemption.

The association is exempt from the payment of fees and taxes levied by the state or any of its political subdivisions except taxes levied on real or personal property.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992)